vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Hoạt động và thể thao mùa đông > Trượt tuyết băng đồng và trượt ván trên tuyết > Dụng cụ chỉnh ván trượt tuyết: Nến sửa chữa đế ski & ván trượt tuyết; Bàn chải cho ski & ván trượt tuyết; Giũa kim cương cho ski và ván trượt tuyết; Bộ điều chỉnh cạnh ski & ván trượt tuyết; Sản phẩm P-Tex cho ski & ván trượt tuyết; Kéo cho ski & ván trượt tuyết; Bộ dụng cụ bảo dưỡng ván trượt và ván trượt tuyết; Mỏ cặp ski & ván trượt tuyết; Dung dịch loại bỏ sáp trên ski & ván trượt tuyết; Dụng cụ cạo sáp ván trượt và ván trượt tuyết; Bàn ghế quét sáp ván trượt và ván trượt tuyết; Bàn là sáp trên ski & ván trượt tuyết
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Téli sportok és tevékenységek > Síelés és snowboardozás > Sí- és snowboardhangoló eszközök: Sí- és snowboard-alapjavító gyertyák; Sí- és snowboardkefék; Sí- és snowboard gyémántreszelők; Sí- és snowboard-széljavítók; Sí- és snowboard P-Tex termékek; Sí- és snowboardollók; Sí- és snowboardkarbantartó készletek; Sí- és snowboardsatuk; Sí- és snowboard-viaszeltávolítók; Sí- és snowboard-waxkaparók; Sí- és snowboardwaxoló padok és asztalok; Sí- és snowboard-viaszvasalók
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 冬季运动与活动 > 滑雪与单板滑雪 > 滑雪板/单板保养工具: 滑雪板/单板底座修复蜡; 滑雪板/单板刷; 滑雪板/单板金刚石锉刀; 滑雪板/单板边缘调节器; 滑雪板/单板 P-Tex 产品; 滑雪板/单板剪刀; 滑雪板调校套件; 滑雪板/单板虎钳; 滑雪板/单板除蜡剂; 滑雪板刮蜡板; 滑雪板打蜡工作台; 滑雪板/单板打蜡熨斗
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Зимние виды спорта и игры > Лыжный спорт и сноубординг > Инструменты для подготовки лыж и сноубордов: Свечи для ремонта скользящей поверхности лыж и сноубордов; Щетки для лыж и сноубордов; Алмазные напильники для лыж и сноубордов; Канторезы для лыж и сноубордов; Пластик для ремонта лыж и сноубордов; Ножницы для лыж и сноубордов; Наборы для обслуживания лыж и сноубордов; Тиски для лыж и сноубордов; Скребки для лыж и сноубордов; Цикли для лыж и сноубордов; Станки и столы для подготовки лыж и сноубордов; Утюги для нанесения мазей на лыжи и сноуборды
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Vintersport og aktiviteter > Ski- og snowboardutstyr > Tuningverktøy for ski og snowboard: Basereparasjonslys for ski og snowboard; Ski- og snowboardbørster; Diamantfiler for ski og snowboard; Kanttrimmere for ski og snowboard; P-Tex-produkter for ski og snowboard; Sakser for ski og snowboard; Preppesett for ski og snowboard; Skrustikker for ski og snowboard; Voksfjernere for ski og snowboard; Sikler for ski og snowboard; Smørebenker og -bord for ski og snowboard; Voksjern for ski og snowboard
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Actividades y deportes de invierno > Esquí y snowboard > Herramientas para afilar esquís y tablas de snowboard: Velas reparadoras de bases de esquí y snowboard; Cepillos para esquí y snowboard; Limas de diamante para esquí y snowboard; Afinadores de cantos para esquí y snowboard; Productos P-Tex para esquí y snowboard; Tijeras para esquí y snowboard; Kits de mantenimiento para esquí y snowboard; Tornillos de banco para esquí y snowboard; Removedores de cera para esquí y snowboard; Raspadores de cera para esquí y snowboard; Bancos y mesas de encerado para esquí y snowboard; Planchas de cera para esquí y snowboard
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport e attività invernali > Sci e snowboard > Strumenti per la preparazione di sci e snowboard: Candele per riparazione solette da sci e snowboard; Spazzole per sci e snowboard; Lime diamantate per sci e snowboard; Accordatori per sci e snowboard; Prodotti P-Tex per sci e snowboard; Forbici da sci e snowboard; Kit di manutenzione per sci e snowboard; Morse per sci e snowboard; Decapanti per sci e snowboard; Spatole per sciolina da sci e snowboard; Banchi e tavoli per sciolinatura di sci e snowboard; Ferri per sciolinatura sci e snowboard
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Wintersport & -Aktivitäten > Skisport & Snowboarden > Tuningwerkzeuge für Skis & Snowboards: Reparaturkerzen für Ski- und Snowboard-Beläge; Ski- und Snowboardbürsten; Diamantfeilen; Kantenschleifer für Ski und Snowboard; P-Tex-Produkte für Ski und Snowboard; Scheren für Ski und Snowboard; Ski- & Snowboard-Tuning-Sets; Schraubstöcke für Ski und Snowboard; Wachsentferner für Ski und Snowboard; Wachsabziehklingen für Ski & Snowboards; Wachsbänke & -tische für Ski & Snowboards; Wachsbügeleisen für Ski und Snowboard
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Esportes e atividades de inverno > Esqui e snowboarding > Ferramentas de ajuste para ski e snowboard: Velas para reparo de bases de esqui e snowboard; Escovas para esqui e snowboard; Lixas de diamante para esqui e snowboard; Afinadores para esqui e snowboard; Produtos P-Tex para esqui e snowboard; Tesouras para esqui e snowboard; Kits de manutenção para esqui e snowboard; Visores para esqui e snowboard; Removedores de cera para esqui e snowboard; Raspadores de cera para esqui e snowboard; Bancadas e mesas de enceramento para esqui e snowboard; Ferros de encerar para esqui e snowboard
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Зимни спортове и дейности > Каране на ски и сноуборд > Инструменти за сервиз на ски и сноуборд: Пръчки за поправка на основи за ски и сноуборд; Четки за ски и сноуборд; Диамантени пили за ски и сноуборд; Точила за кантове на ски и сноуборд; P-Tex продукти за ски и сноуборд; Ножици за ски и сноуборд; Комплекти за настройване на ски и сноуборд; Менгемета за ски и сноуборд; Препарати за отстраняване на вакса от ски и сноуборд; Стъргалки за вакса за ски и сноуборд; Пейки и маси за ваксиране за ски и сноуборд; Ютии за вакса за ски и сноуборд
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Atividades e desportos de inverno > Esqui e snowboard > Ferramentas de ajuste para esqui e snowboard: Velas para reparação de bases para esqui e snowboard; Escovas para esqui e snowboard; Lixas de diamante para esqui e snowboard; Afinadores de extremidades para esqui e snowboard; Produtos P-Tex para esqui e snowboard; Tesouras para esqui e snowboard; Kits de manutenção para ski e snowboard; Vises para esqui e snowboard; Removedores de cera para esqui e snowboard; Raspadores de cera para ski e snowboard; Bancadas e mesas de encerar para ski e snowboard; Ferros para encerar para esqui e snowboard
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Zimski športi in dejavnosti > Smučanje in deskanje na snegu > Orodja za nastavitev smuči in desk: Svečke za popravilo oblog smuči in desk; Ščetke za smuči in deske; Diamantne pile za smuči in deske; Pripomočki za nastavitev robnikov smuči in desk; Izdelki P-Tex za smuči in deske; Škarje za smuči in deske; Kompleti za nastavitev smuči in snežnih desk; Primeži za smuči in deske; Odstranjevalci voska za smuči in deske; Strgalniki za vosek za smuči in snežne deske; Klopi in mize za voskanje smuči in snežnih desk; Likalnik za voskanje smuči in desk
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Wintersport en -activiteiten > Skiën en snowboarden > Onderhoudssets voor ski's en snowboards: Basisreparatiekaarsen voor ski's en snowboards; Borstels voor ski's en snowboards; Diamantvijlen voor ski's en snowboards; Randtuners voor ski's en snowboards; P-Texproducten voor ski's en snowboards; Scharen voor ski's en snowboards; Onderhoudskits voor ski's en snowboards; Vizieren voor ski's en snowboards; Waxverwijderaars voor ski's en snowboards; Waxkrabbers voor ski's en snowboards; Waxtafels en -banken voor ski's en snowboards; Waxijzers voor ski's en snowboards
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Talviurheilu ja -harrastukset > Hiihto ja lumilautailu > Suksien ja lumilaudan säätötyökalut: Suksien ja lumilaudan peruskorjauskynttilät; Suksien ja lumilaudan harjat; Suksien ja lumilaudan timanttiviilat; Suksien ja lumilaudan reunavirittimet; Suksien ja lumilaudan P-Tex-tuotteet; Suksien ja lumilaudan sakset; Suksien ja lumilautojen huoltopakkaukset; Suksien ja lumilaudan ruuvipenkit; Suksien ja lumilaudan vahanpoistajat; Suksien ja lumilautojen voitesiklit; Suksien ja lumilautojen voitelutelineet ja -pöydät; Suksien ja lumilaudan vahausraudat
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาและกิจกรรมในฤดูหนาว > สกีและสโนว์บอร์ด > เครื่องมือปรับแต่งสำหรับสกีและสโนว์บอร์ด: เทียนซ่อมฐานสกีและสโนว์บอร์ด; แปรงสำหรับสกีและสโนว์บอร์ด; ตะไบเพชรสำหรับสกีและสโนว์บอร์ด; เครื่องปรับขอบสกีและสโนว์บอร์ด; ผลิตภัณฑ์ P-Tex สำหรับสกีและสโนว์บอร์ด; กรรไกรสำหรับสกีและสโนว์บอร์ด; ชุดเครื่องมือปรับแต่งสกีและสโนว์บอร์ด; ปากกาจับสกีและสโนว์บอร์ด; น้ำยาล้างแวกซ์สำหรับสกีและสโนว์บอร์ด; ที่ขูดแว็กซ์สกีและสโนว์บอร์ด; ม้านั่งและโต๊ะลงแว็กซ์สกีและสโนว์บอร์ด; ที่รีดแวกซ์สำหรับสกีและสโนว์บอร์ด
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kış Sporları ve Aktiviteleri > Kayak ve Snowboard > Kayak ve Kar Kaykayı Ayar Araçları: Kayak ve Snowboard Tabanı Tamir Mumları; Kayak ve Snowboard Fırçaları; Kayak ve Snowboard Elmas Dosyaları; Kayak ve Snowboard Kenar Ayarlayıcıları; Kayak ve Snowboard P-Tex Ürünleri; Kayak ve Snowboard Makası; Kayak ve snowboard bakım kitleri; Kayak ve Snowboard Mengeneleri; Kayak ve Snowboard Balmumu Gidericiler; Kayak ve snowboard vaks kazıyıcıları; Kayak ve snowboard vaks masaları ve sehpaları; Kayak ve Snowboard Wax Demirleri
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Zimné športy a aktivity > Lyžovanie a snowboarding > Nástroje na brúsenie lyží a snowboardov: Sviečky na opravu sklznice lyží a snowboardov; Kefy na lyže a snowboardy; Diamantové pilníky na lyže a snowboardy; Brúsky hrán na lyže a snowboardy; Produkty P-Tex na lyže a snowboardy; Nožnice na lyže a snowboardy; Súpravy na údržbu lyží a snowboardov; Zveráky na lyže a snowboardy; Odstraňovače vosku na lyže a snowboardy; Škrabky na vosk na lyže a snowboard; Lavice a stoly na voskovanie lyží a snowboardov; Voskové žehličky na lyže a snowboardy
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 冬季運動 > 單/雙板滑雪 > 滑雪板打蠟工具: 滑雪和單板滑雪板補板膠; 滑雪板刷; 滑雪和單板滑雪鑽石銼刀; 滑雪和單板滑雪修邊器; 滑雪和單板滑雪 P-Tex 產品; 滑雪板剪刀; 雙板與單板滑雪板保養工具包; 滑雪板虎鉗; 滑雪板除蠟劑; 雙板與單板滑雪板刮蠟板; 雙板與單板滑雪板打蠟工作台與桌子; 滑雪板打蠟熨斗
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Activități și sporturi de iarnă > Schi și snowboarding > Instrumente de personalizare pentru schiuri și plăci de snowboarding: Ceară pentru reparații bază schiuri și plăci de snowboard; Perii pentru schiuri și plăci de snowboarding; Pile de diamant pentru schiuri și plăci de snowboarding; Tăietoare de margini pentru schiuri și plăci de snowboarding; Produse P-Tex pentru schiuri și plăci de snowboarding; Foarfeci pentru schiuri și plăci de snowboarding; Kituri de întreținere pentru schi și snowboard; Menghine pentru schiuri și plăci de snowboarding; Dispozitive de îndepărtare a cerii pentru schiuri și plăci de snowboarding; Raclete pentru ceară de schi și snowboard; Bănci și mese pentru aplicarea de ceară pe schi și snowboard; Dispozitive de ceruire pentru schiuri și plăci de snowboarding
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Vintersport og -aktiviteter > Ski og snowboard > Værktøjer til optimering af ski og snowboards: Ski og snowboard – reparationsstearinlys; Ski og snowboard – børster; Ski og snowboard – diamantfiler; Ski og snowboard – kanttunere; Ski og snowboard – P-Tex-produkter; Ski og snowboard – sakse; Vedligeholdelsessæt til ski og snowboard; Ski og snowboard – visirer; Ski og snowboard – voksfjernere; Voksskrabere til ski og snowboard; Smørebænke og -borde til ski og snowboard; Ski og snowboard – voksejern
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Activités et sports d'hiver > Ski et snowboard > Articles d'entretien pour skis et snowboards: Bougies de réparation de bases de ski et de snowboard; Brosses pour skis et snowboards; Limes diamantées pour skis et snowboards; Affûteurs de carres pour skis et snowboards; Produits P-Tex pour skis et snowboard; Ciseaux de ski et de snowboard; Kits d’entretien pour skis et snowboards; Étaux pour skis et snowboards; Décapants à fartage pour skis et snowboards; Racles à fart pour skis et snowboards; Établis et tables de fartage pour skis et snowboards; Fers à farter pour skis et snowboards
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Sporty zimowe i rekreacja zimą > Jazda na nartach i snowboardzie > Narzędzia do tuningu nart i snowboardu: Świece do naprawy ślizgów nart i snowboardu; Pędzle do nart i snowboardu; Diamentowe pliki do nart i snowboardu; Krawędziówki do nart i snowboardu; Produkty P-Tex do nart i snowboardu; Nożyczki do nart i snowboardu; Zestawy do serwisu nart i snowboardu; Imadła do nart i snowboardu; Zmywacze wosku do nart i snowboardu; Cykliny do nart i snowboardu; Stoły i ławki do smarowania nart i snowboardu; Żelazka do woskowania nart i snowboardu
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Zimski sportovi i aktivnosti > Skijanje i snowboardanje > Alati za podešavanje skija i snowboarda: Štapići za popravak baze skija i snowboarda; Četke za skije i snowboarde; Dijamantne turpije za skije i snowboarde; Podešivači rubova skija i snowboarda; P-Tex proizvodi za skijanje i snowboardanje; Škare za skije i snowboarde; Kompleti za podešavanje za skijanje i snowboardanje; Stege za skije i snowboarde; Sredstva za uklanjanje voska sa skija i snowboarda; Strugači za vosak za skijanje i snowboardanje; Klupe i stolovi za nanošenje voska za skijanje i snowboardanje; Glačalo za vosak za održavanje skija i snowboarda
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウィンタースポーツ > スキー・スノーボード用品 > スキー・スノーボード用チューニング用品: スキー・スノーボードベースリペアキャンドル; スキー・スノーボード用ブラシ; スキー・スノーボード用ダイヤモンドファイル; スキー・スノーボード用エッジチューナー; スキー・スノーボード用P-Tex製品; スキー・スノーボード用はさみ; スキー・スノーボード用チューニングキット; スキー・スノーボード用バイス; スキー・スノーボード用ワックスリムーバー; スキー・スノーボード用ワックススクレーパー; スキー・スノーボード用ワクシングベンチ・テーブル; スキー・スノーボード用ワクシングアイロン
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Žiemos sportas ir veikla > Slidinėjimas ir snieglenčių sportas > Slidžių ir snieglenčių derinimo įrankiai: Slidžių ir snieglenčių pagrindo remonto žvakės; Slidžių ir snieglenčių šepečiai; Deimantinės dildės slidėms ir snieglentėms; Slidžių ir snieglenčių briaunų galandimo įrankiai; Slidžių ir snieglenčių „P-Tex“ gaminiai; Slidžių ir snieglenčių žirklės; Slidinėjimo ir snieglenčių derinimo rinkiniai; Slidžių ir snieglenčių spaustuvai; Slidžių ir snieglenčių vaško valikliai; Slidinėjimo ir snieglenčių vaško grandyklės; Slidžių ir snieglenčių vaškavimo suolai ir stalai; Slidžių ir snieglenčių vaškavimo lygintuvai
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 겨울 스포츠/액티비티 > 스키/스노보드 > 스키/스노보드 튜닝 도구: 스키/스노보드 베이스 수리용 캔들; 스키/스노보드 브러시; 스키/스노보드 다이아몬드 파일; 스키/스노보드 엣지 튜너; 스키/스노보드 P-TEX 제품; 스키/스노보드 가위; 스키 및 스노보드 튜닝 키트; 스키/스노보드 바이스; 스키/스노보드 왁스 제거제; 스키 및 스노보드 왁스 스크래퍼; 스키 및 스노보드 왁싱 벤치 및 테이블; 스키/스노보드 왁싱 다리미
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Winter Sports & Activities > Skiing & Snowboarding > Ski & Snowboard Tuning Tools: Ski & Snowboard Base Repair Candles; Ski & Snowboard Brushes; Ski & Snowboard Diamond Files; Ski & Snowboard Edge Tuners; Ski & Snowboard P-Tex Products; Ski & Snowboard Scissors; Ski & Snowboard Tuning Kits; Ski & Snowboard Vises; Ski & Snowboard Wax Removers; Ski & Snowboard Wax Scrapers; Ski & Snowboard Waxing Benches & Tables; Ski & Snowboard Waxing Irons
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Zimní sporty a aktivity > Lyžování a snowboarding > Tuningové nástroje pro lyžování a snowboarding: Sada svíček na opravu poškozených lyžařských a snowboardových skluznic; Kartáče na skluznice lyží a snowboardů; Diamantový kámen k leštění hran lyží a snowboardů; Ostřiče hran lyží a snowboardů; P-Tex materiál pro lyže a snowboardy; Voskovací stojany na lyže a snowboardy; Sady na údržbu lyží a snowboardů; Svěráky na lyže a snowboardy; Odstraňovače vosku na lyže a snowboardy; Škrabky na vosk na lyže a snowboardy; Stoly a podstavce na voskování lyží a snowboardů; Žehličky na voskování lyží a snowboardů
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Vintersporter och -aktiviteter > Skid- och snowboardåkning > Justeringsverktyg för skidor och snowboard: Reparationsbeläggning för skid- och snowboardbas; Skid- och snowboardborstar; Skid- och snowboarddiamantfilar; Skid- och snowboardkantslipare; P-Tex-produkter för skidor och snowboard; Skid- och snowboardsaxar; Servicekit för skidor och snowboard; Skid- och snowboardskärmar; Skid- och snowboardvallaborttagare; Vallaskrapor för skidor och snowboard; Vallaställ och vallabord för skidor och snowboard; Skid- och snowboardvallajärn
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Χειμερινά αθλήματα & δραστηριότητες > Σκι & σνόουμπορντ > Εργαλεία ρύθμισης για σκι & σνόουμπορντ: Κεριά επισκευής βάσης για σκι & σνόουμπορντ; Βούρτσες για σκι & σνόουμπορντ; Λίμες διαμαντιού για σκι & σνόουμπορντ; Ρυθμιστές ακμών για σκι & σνόουμπορντ; Προϊόντα P-Tex για σκι & σνόουμπορντ; Ψαλίδια για σκι & σνόουμπορντ; Κιτ συντήρησης για σκι και snowboard; Μέγγενες για σκι & σνόουμπορντ; Αφαιρετικά κεριού για σκι & σνόουμπορντ; Ξύστρες κεριού για σκι και snowboard; Πάγκοι και τραπέζια κερώματος για σκι και snowboard; Σίδερα κεριού για σκι & σνόουμπορντ